Arkansas, session 2025, HB1322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-10-608(b)(1), concerning the death of an
active member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System before
retirement as a result of personal injury or disease that arose in the
performance of his or her duty as an employee, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) If an active member dies in employer-paid service before
retirement as a result of a personal injury or disease which the Board of
Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System finds to
have arisen out of and in the course of his or her actual performance of duty
as an employee, the applicable benefits provided in this subsection and
subsections (c)-(e) of this section shall be paid, subject to § 24-10-610.
(B) As used in this subdivision (b)(1):
(i) "Disease" includes without limitation a cancer
that an active member was diagnosed with while he or she was in the line of
*LJH070*
02-26-2025 10:26:00 LJH070

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 HB1322
duty; and
(ii) "Cancer" means:
(a) Leukemia, lymphoma, mesothelioma, or
multiple myeloma;
(b) Cancer of the brain, urinary tract, liver,
skin, breast, cervix, thyroid, prostate, testicle, colon, or digestive tract;
or
(c) A cancer that has been found by research
and statistics to show higher instances of occurrence in firefighters than in
the general population, as determined by the Department of Health and with
consideration to the findings of the International Agency for Research on
Cancer, if the firefighter was:
(1) Exposed to a known carcinogen while
in the course of his or her actual performance of duty as an employee; and
(2) Diagnosed with the cancer under this
subdivision (b)(1)(B)(i)(c) while in the line of duty.
(C) A finding that an active member was diagnosed with
cancer while he or she was in the line of duty may be rebutted by a
preponderance of the evidence.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. SPECIAL LANGUAGE.
A spouse annuity with an effective date after November 1, 2019, and
before March 1, 2020, payable under § 24-10-608(b)(1)(A) due to cancer as
defined under § 24-10-608(b)(1)(B)(ii), shall have the annuity adjusted to
the greater of twenty-five (25) years of credited service or an amount equal
to the annuity for each year of credited service resulting from employment as
provided under § 24-10-602.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly for this act to have a
retroactive effect as to the active members covered by Section 2 of this act.
(b) It is not the intent of the General Assembly for this act to
require the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System to pay any
retroactive benefits.

SECTION 4. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
02-26-2025 10:26:00 LJH070

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 HB1322
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of the Arkansas
Local Police and Fire Retirement System related to line-of-duty death due to
occupational cancer are in need of urgent revision to provide fair and just
treatment to members and the beneficiaries of members who have died in the
line of duty as a result of cancer that occurred as a result of those
members' occupation; and that an effective date of July 1, 2025, is necessary
in order to allow time to allow for a structured and proper administration
and to send educational notices to covered employers of the procedures
referenced in this act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and
this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health,
and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2025.

/s/Clowney























02-26-2025 10:26:00 LJH070